Hawaii statutes.
[§431P-6] Advisory committee.
To assist it in implementing this chapter the fund may appoint an advisory
committee consisting of:

(1) Not less than one individual who is employed or
trained as a meteorologist and possesses knowledge of the history, trends, and
nature of windstorms in the Pacific Ocean;

(2) Not less than one individual who is a member of
the American Academy of Actuaries; and

(3) Not less than one individual who is a structural
engineer licensed to practice in the State and is knowledgeable about local
community building codes.

The fund may establish additional advisory
committees as it may deem necessary in furtherance of this chapter. [L 1993, c
339, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next